Ohio, session 136, HB398.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 4765.36 and 4765.361 of the 6
Revised Code be amended to read as follows: 7
Sec. 4765.36. (A) In a hospital, an emergency medical 8
technician-basic, emergency medical technician-intermediate, or 9
emergency medical technician-paramedic may perform emergency or 10
nonemergency medical services in the locations and under the 11
circumstances described in division (B) of this section, but 12
only if the services are performed in accordance with both of 13
the following conditions: 14
(A) Only in the hospital's emergency department or while 15
moving a patient between the emergency department and another 16
part of the hospital; 17
(B) Only under the direction and supervision of one of the 18
following: 19
(1) A physician; 20

H. B. No. 398 Page 2
As Introduced
(2) A physician assistant designated by a physician; 21
(3) A registered nurse designated by a physician. 22
(B)(1) In a hospital's emergency department or while 23
moving a patient between the emergency department and another 24
area of the hospital, an EMT-basic, EMT-I, or paramedic may 25
perform emergency medical services. 26
(2) In any area of a hospital, an EMT-basic, EMT-I, or 27
paramedic, as the case may be under division (B)(2)(a) or (b) of 28
this section, may perform nonemergency medical services, but 29
only if the services are performed in accordance with privileges 30
delineated by the hospital. 31
(a) An EMT-basic, EMT-I, or paramedic may do either of the 32
following: 33
(i) Obtain a patient's vital signs; 34
(ii) Transport a patient, including one who requires 35
continuous monitoring, from one area of the hospital to another. 36
(b) An EMT-I or paramedic may place for a patient a 37
peripheral intravenous line or an intraosseous line, including 38
with the assistance of ultrasound. 39
(C) Division (B)(2) of this section does not prevent an 40
EMT-basic, EMT-I, or paramedic from performing any of the 41
services described in that division when performed as emergency 42
medical services under division (B)(1) of this section. 43
Sec. 4765.361. An In any place or setting other than a 44
hospital, an emergency medical technician-basic, emergency 45
medical technician-intermediate, or emergency medical 46
technician-paramedic may perform as nonemergency medical 47
services any of the emergency medical services that the 48

H. B. No. 398 Page 3
As Introduced
technician is authorized by law to perform in nonemergency 49
situations , but only if the services are performed under the 50
direction of the technician's medical director or cooperating 51
physician advisory board. In nonemergency situationsUnder this 52
section, no medical director or cooperating physician advisory 53
board shall delegate, instruct, or otherwise authorize a 54
technician an EMT-basic, EMT-I, or paramedic to perform as a 55
nonemergency medical service any medical service that the 56
technician is not authorized by law to perform as an emergency 57
medical service. 58
Section 2. That existing sections 4765.36 and 4765.361 of 59
the Revised Code are hereby repealed. 60